test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kealkk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeâlkk â-stem: # Noun 'milk/maito' - full paradigm
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩeâlkk
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩeâlk
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩeâlk
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩiõlkku
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩeâlkast
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩeâlkain
     ǩeâlkk+N+Ess+Indef: ǩeâlkkan
     ǩeâlkk+N+Par+Indef: ǩeâlkkad
     ǩeâlkk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâlktaa, ǩeâlktää]
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩeâlk
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩeâlkai
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩeâlkaid
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩeâlkaid
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩeâlkain
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩeâlkaivuiʹm
     ǩeâlkk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâlkaitaa, ǩeâlkaitää]
